Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1838
Five-year period; when commenced.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law with respect to the timely bringing of an action, the five-year period provided for in section 81-1837 shall not begin to run until the accused has deposited money into the Victim's Compensation Fund.

Laws 1978, LB 910, § 38.